nb: Harmonikasystem/type: Akkord; Alt; Baryton; Bass; Akkord; Kontrabass; Ensemble- / seksjonssett; Melodi / lead; Polyfoni; Sopran; Tenor; Annet
ko: 하모니카 시스템/유형: 어코드; 알토; 바리톤; 베이스; 코드; 더블 베이스; 앙상블/섹션 세트; 멜로디/리드; 폴리포니아; 소프라노; 테너; 기타
bg-BG: Система/тип хармоника: Акорд; Алто; Баритон; Бас; Акордна; Контрабас; Ансамбъл/секция; Мелодия/водеща; Полифония; Сопрано; Тенор; Друго
el: Σύστημα/τύπος φυσαρμόνικας: Συγχορδιών; Άλτο; Βαρύτονο; Μπάσο; Συγχορδιών; Κοντραμπάσο; Σύνολο/Σετ ενορχήστρωσης; Μελωδία/Κύρια μελωδία; Πολυφωνική; Σοπράνο; Τενόρο; Άλλο
pl: System/typ harmonijki: Akord; Alt; Baryton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Zestaw zespołowy/sekcyjny; Melodia/Głos prowadzący; Polifonia; Sopran; Tenor; Inny
de: System/Typ der Mundharmonika: Akkord; Alt; Bariton; Bass; Akkord; Kontrabass; Ensemble/Sektions-Set; Melodie/Lead; Polyphonia; Sopran; Tenor; Sonstige
da: Type/system for harmonika: Akkord; Alt; Baryton; Bas; Akkord; Kontrabas; Ensemble/sektionssæt; Melodi/lead; Polyphonia; Sopran; Tenor; Andet
tr: Mızıka sistemi/türü: Akort; Alto; Bariton; Bas; Akor; Kontrbas; Topluluk/Bölüm seti; Melodi/Lead; Polifoni; Soprano; Tenor; Diğer
nl: Mondharmonica systeem/type: Akkoord; Alt; Bariton; Bas; Akkoord; Contrabas; Ensemble/sectieset; Melodie/lead; Polyphonia; Sopraan; Tenor; Overig
pt-BR: Tipo/sistema da gaita: Acorde; Contralto; Barítono; Baixo; Acordes; Contrabaixo; Conjunto para orquestra; Melodia/Principal; Polifônica; Soprano; Tenor; Outro
hu: Szájharmonika rendszere/típusa: Akkord; Alt; Bariton; Basszus; Akkord; Nagybőgő; Együttes / szekció készlet; Dallam / szóló; Polifónia; Szoprán; Tenor; Egyéb
pt-PT: Sistema/tipo de harmónica: Acorde; Alto; Barítono; Baixo; Acorde; Contrabaixo; Conjunto de ensemble/secção; Melodia/principal; Polifonia; Soprano; Tenor; Outro
zh-TW: 口琴系統/類型: 和弦; 中音; 上低音; 低音; 和弦; 倍低音; 合奏/聲部套組; 旋律/主音; 多音 (Polyphonia); 高音; 次中音; 其他
ro-RO: Sistem/tip de armonică: Acord; Alto; Bariton; Bas; Acord; Contrabas; Set ansamblu/secțiune; Melodie/solist; Polifonie; Sopran; Tenor; Altele
ru: Система или тип губной гармоники: Аккорд; Альт; Баритон; Бас; Аккордовая; Контрабас; Ансамблевая/секционная; Мелодическая/соло; Полифония; Сопрано; Тенор; Другое
sl-SI: Sistem/vrsta ustne harmonike: Akord; Alt; Bariton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Ansambel/sekcijski komplet; Melodija/vodilno; Polifonija; Sopran; Tenor; Drugo
fi: Huuliharpun järjestelmä/tyyppi: Sointu; Altto; Baritoni; Basso; Sointu; Kontrabasso; Yhtye-/sektiosetti; Melodia/liidi; Polyphonia; Sopraano; Tenori; Muu
fr: Système ou type d’harmonica: Accord; Alto; Baryton; Basse; Accord; Contrebasse; Ensemble/jeu de sections; Mélodie/solo; Polyphonia; Soprano; Ténor; Autre
sk-SK: Systém/typ harmoniky: Akord; Alt; Barytón; Bas; Akordová; Dvojitý bas; Ansámblová/sekciová súprava; Melodická/sólová; Polyfónna; Soprán; Tenor; Iné
hr-HR: Sustav/vrsta harmonike: Akord; Alt; Bariton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Ansambl / komplet za sekciju; Melodija / vodeći instrument; Polifonija; Sopran; Tenor; Ostalo
zh-CN: 口琴系统/类型: 和弦; 中音; 上低音; 低音; 和弦; 倍低音; 合奏/声部套装; 主旋律/主音; 复音; 高音; 次中音; 其他
th: ระบบ/ประเภทฮาร์โมนิกา: แอคคอร์ด; อัลโต; แบริโทน; เบส; คอร์ด; ดับเบิลเบส; อองซอมเบิล/ชุดเซกชัน; เมโลดี้/ลีด; โพลีโฟเนีย; โซปราโน; เทเนอร์; อื่นๆ
it: Sistema/tipo di armonica a bocca: Accordo; Contralto; Baritono; Basso; Ad accordi; Contrabbasso; Set da ensemble/sezione; Melodia/solista; Polifonica; Soprano; Tenore; Altro
cs: Systém/typ harmoniky: Akordová; Altová; Barytonová; Basová; Akordová; Kontrabasová; Sada pro soubor/sekci; Melodická/hlavní; Polyfonní; Sopránová; Tenorová; Jiné
ja: ハーモニカのシステム／タイプ: アコード; アルト; バリトン; バス; コード; ダブルベース; アンサンブル/セクションセット; メロディ/リード; ポリフォニア; ソプラノ; テナー; その他
en: Harmonica system/type: Accord; Alto; Baritone; Bass; Chord; Double bass; Ensemble/Section set; Melody/Lead; Polyphonia; Soprano; Tenor; Other
vi: Hệ thống/loại kèn harmonica: Accord; Alto; Baritone; Bass; Hợp âm; Double bass; Bộ hòa tấu/phân đoạn; Giai điệu/Bè chính; Polyphonia; Soprano; Tenor; Khác
es: Sistema o tipo de armónica: Acorde; Alto; Barítono; Bajo; Acorde; Contrabajo; Conjunto/sección; Melodía/solista; Polifonía; Soprano; Tenor; Otro
sv: Harmonikasystem/typ: Ackord; Alt; Baryton; Bas; Ackord; Kontrabas; Ensemble/sektionsset; Melodi/lead; Polyfoni; Sopran; Tenor; Övrigt
lt-LT: Armonikos sistema / tipas: Akordas; Altas; Baritonas; Bosas; Akordas; Kontrabosas; Ansamblio / sekcijos rinkinys; Melodija / pagrindinė; Polifonija; Sopranas; Tenoras; Kita